extras/nouns.lexc
!! Noun Lexc !!

Multichar_Symbols +N +Pl +Sg +V +P1sg +P2sg +P3sp +P1pl +P2pl +Nom +Gen +Dat +Acc +Loc +Abl +Ins +P1 +P2 +P3 +Num +Subst +Ord +Dist +İfi +Cond +Nfh +Px1sg +Px2sg +Px3sp +Px2pl +Px3pl +İmp +Neg +Gpraor +Pres +Aor +Prog +Fut +Ger +Gerpast +Gerabst +Gernfh +Gpr_fut +Gpr_past +Gpr_rsub +Gpr_nfh +Gpr_aor +Gna_per +Gna_impf +Gna_ferq +Gna_when1 +Gna_when2 +Gna_time1 +Gna_time2 +Gna_cond +Gna_2 +Iv +Abil +Coop +Pass +Cau

LEXICON Root
Noun ;

LEXICON Noun

araba N1; ! Deletion of i
yakın N1; ! L becomes n after nasal consonant
azınnık:azın^lık N1; 

!!! NOUN !!!
 
LEXICON Possesives
+P1sg:^im #;
+P2sg:^in #;
+P3sp:^sin #;
+P1pl:^imiz #;
+P2pl:^iniz #;

LEXICON Cases
+Nom: #;
+Gen:^nın #;
+Loc:^da #;
+Abl:^nan #;
+Abl:^dan #;
+Acc:^nı #;
+Dat:^na #;

LEXICON Plural
+Pl:^lar #; 

LEXICON N1
+N:0 #;
+N: Plural;
+N: Possesives;
+N: Cases; 
